Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.390

Consolidation of districts—Order of consolidation.

Should not less than two-thirds of the votes of each of the respective districts proposed to be consolidated favor consolidation the county commissioners shall immediately:

(1) Enter an order on its minutes consolidating all of the districts proposed for consolidation into one district with name as specified in the concurrent resolution.

(2) Transmit a certified copy of the order to the county commissioners of any other county in which any portion of the consolidated district is situated.

(3) Record a copy in the office of the county auditor of each of the counties in which any portion of the consolidated district is situated.

(4) File a copy in the office of the secretary of state.

After the transmission, recording and filing of the order, the territory in the districts entering into the consolidation proposal forms a single consolidated district.

[ 1957 c 153 s 39.]